West Virginia, session 2026, HB5479.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. Federal Immigration Enforcement. §15-16-9. Implementation; discrimination prohibited. (a) This article code shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws and regulations governing immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) A state entity, local entity, or law enforcement agency, or a person employed by or otherwise under the direction or control of a state entity, local entity, or law enforcement agency, shall not base its actions under this article on the gender, race, color, religion, language, national origin, or physical disability of a person except to the extent authorized by the United States Constitution, the constitution and laws of this state, or other applicable federal law. (c) A law-enforcement officer may not intentionally conceal the officer’s official identity or law-enforcement authority, including by wearing a mask, face covering, or other device that obscures the officer’s face or identity, during a non-custodial investigatory stop that is conducted without a warrant and that is not supported by probable cause.  For purposes of this subsection, “conceal the officer’s official identity” includes intentionally failing or refusing to identify oneself as a law-enforcement officer, intentionally obscuring a badge or other indicia of law-enforcement authority, or wearing a mask, face covering, or disguise for the purpose of preventing identification as a law-enforcement officer.   This subsection does not apply when: (1) The officer is acting pursuant to a valid arrest or search warrant; (2) The officer is engaged in an undercover or covert operation authorized by law; (3) Concealment of identity or authority, including the wearing of a mask or face covering, is expressly authorized by federal or state law or regulation; (4) The officer reasonably determines that disclosure of identity would create an imminent risk to officer safety or would compromise an active investigation; or (5) Exigent circumstances exist, and the concealment of identity is reasonably necessary to address the exigency.